apertium-kan.kan.lexc
LEXICON 			ಅಣು__n
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:#;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ವೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳ #;!ವರ್ಷ
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ವು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ವನ್ನು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಗಳನ್ನು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ವಿಗೆ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ದ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಗಳಿಗೆ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ವಿನ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಗಳಿನ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಗಳ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ವಿನಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಗಳಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ವಿಂದ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ದಿಂದ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ಗಳಿಂದ #;

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ವ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:aagi__com;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ವ endare__part;



LEXICON ಹುಡುಗ__n
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:# ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಿ # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ನು # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<hon%>:ಯವರು # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ರು # ;!ತಂದೆಯವರ
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<hon%>:ಯವರ # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ರ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ನ # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ರ # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ರುಗಳ # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ನಿಗೆ # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ರಿಗೆ # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ನಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ರಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನನ್ನು # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ರನ್ನು # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ನಿಂದ # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ರಿಂದ # ;

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:aagi__com ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ನ aagi__com ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ರ aagi__com  ;

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ನಿಗ oo__inc_clit ;


LEXICON ಜನರು__n
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ರು # ;!ರಿದ್ದಾರೆ
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ರ oo__inc_clit ;!ರಿದ್ದಾರೆ
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ನ # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ರ # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ನಿಗೆ # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ರಿಗೆ # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ನಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ರಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನನ್ನು # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ರನ್ನು # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ನಿಂದ # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ರಿಂದ # ;

%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ರ aagi__com ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ರಿ ide__vaux ;!
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ರ ondige ;


LEXICON gerund__n
%<v%>%<ger%>%<dat%>:ಕ್ಕೆ #;
%<v%>%<ger%>%<acc%>:ನ್ನು #;
%<v%>%<ger%>%<inst%>:ರಿಂದ #;


!LEXICON __case
!%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ವು #;
!%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ರು #;
!%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಗಳಿಗೆ #;
!%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<emph%>:ಯನ್ನುು #;
!%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ಯನ್ನು #;
!%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ರನ್ನು #;
!%<mf%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ರಲ್ಲಿ #;
!%<mf%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದಲ್ಲಿ #;
!%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ನಿಂದ #;!
!%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ರಿಂದ #;
!%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ದಿಂದ #;!ಯಿಂದ
!%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ಯಿಂದ #;!ಗಳಿಂದ
!%<nt%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ಗಳಿಂದ #;
!%<m%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ಇಂದ #;
!%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ಅನ್ನು #;
!%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ನ #;
!%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ರ #;


LEXICON ಸ್ವತಃ__n
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON ತಾಯ__n
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಿ # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಿಯ oo__inc_clit ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ಿಯನ್ನ oo__inc_clit ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಂದಿರ oo__inc_clit ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಿಯ # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಿಗೆ # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ಿಯಿಂದ # ;

LEXICON ಮಹಿಳೆ__n
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳು # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಗಳ # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಯರು # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಯ # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಯರ # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ಯನ್ನು # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಯರನ್ನು # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಗಳನ್ನು # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಗಳಿಗೆ # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಗಳ # ;!ಮಹಿಳೆಯರಲ್ಲಿ
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಯರಲ್ಲಿ # ;!ಮಹಿಳೆ
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಗಳಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಯರಿಗೆ # ;

%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: aagi__com ;

LEXICON sis__n
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: #;
!%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ುಗಳು #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ನಿಗೆ #;
!%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ುಗಳಿಗೆ #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ನ #;
!%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ುಗಳ #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನ್ನು #;
!%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ುಗಳನ್ನು #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ನಲ್ಲಿ #;
!%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ುಗಳಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ನಿಂದ #;
!%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ುಗಳಿನಿಂದ #;



LEXICON women__n
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ು #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ರು #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಿಗೆ #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ರಿಗೆ  #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಿನ #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ರ #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನ್ನು #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ರನ್ನು #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಿನಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಿರಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ಿನಿಂದ #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ಿಗಳಿನಿಂದ #;


LEXICON ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು__adj
%<adj%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<nom%>:ರು # ;
%<adj%>%<nom%>:ವ ಅವ/__prn ;
%<adj%>%<emph%>:ದೇ #;
%<adj%>: ವ oo__inc_clit ;
%<adj%>: kondu ;
%<adj%>: aagi__com ;
%<adj%>: ide__vaux ;
%<adj%>: Golisu__v ;
%<adj%>%<prn%>:ವಾದುವು #;
%<adj%>%+ಅನುಭವ%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಾನುಭವಕ್ಕೆ #;
%<adj%>%+ಅಭಿವೃದ್ಧಿ%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಾಭಿವೃದ್ದಿಗ oo__inc_clit;
%<adj%>%+ಪರಿಮಿತಿ%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಪರಿಮಿತಿಯ ulla;


LEXICON __adj__ondu
%<adj%>:ದ ondu  ;


LEXICON ve__adj
%<adj%>: #;
%<adj%>%<emph%>:ವೇ #;


LEXICON nom__adj
%<adj%>:ದು # ;
%<adj%>%<nt%>:ದು # ;
%<adj%>%<mf%>:ರು # ;
%<adj%>:ದ aagi__com ;

LEXICON ಎಷ್ಟು__adj
%<adj%>:ು # ;
%<adj%>:ೊಂದು # ;
%<adj%>:ರ # ;
%<adj%>%<emph%>:ೇ #;
%<adj%>:o-clit;


LEXICON __adv
%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>: ide__vaux ;
%<adv%>%<loc%>: ಯಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<adv%>%<loc%>: ಯಲ್ಲಿಯ oo__inc_clit;

LEXICON ಒಳಗೆ__adv
%<adv%>:ೆ # ;
%<adv%>:ಡೆ # ;
%<adv%>:ಿನ # ;
%<adv%>:ide__vaux ;





LEXICON now__adv
%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>:ದ # ;
%<adv%>:ಕ್ಕೆ # ;


LEXICON soon__adv
%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>:ದ # ;
%<adv%>%<emph%>:ದಲ್ಲೆ # ;
%<adv%>:ದಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<adv%>%<emph%>:ದಲ್ಲೇ # ;


LEXICON ಇತ್ಯಾದಿ__adv	 
%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>:ಗಳನ್ನು # ;
%<adv%>:ಗಳ antaha ;
%<adv%>:ಗಳ #;
%<adv%>:ಗಳು #;

LEXICON ಇಂದು__adv
%<adv%>:ು # ;
%<adv%>%<gen%>:ಿನ # ;
%<adv%>%<gen%>:ಿನ varege__postpos ;
%<adv%>%<emph%>:ಿಗೂ # ;
%<adv%>%<emph%>:ೂ # ;
%<adv%>%<dat%>:ಿಗೆ # ;

%<adv%>%<gen%>:ಿ n__inda ;


!LEXICON ಅಂದಿ__adv
!%<adv%>: # ;
!%<adv%>: n__inda ;



LEXICON 		ಹಿಂದೆ__post!? can also be adv
%<post%>:ೆ # ; 
%<post%>:ುಗಡೆ # ;
%<post%>%<gen%>:ೆಂದ oo__inc_clit  ;
%<post%>%<emph%>:ೆಯೇ # ;
%<post%>%<dat%>:ೆಕ್ಕೆ # ;!ಹಿಂದಿನಿಂದಲೂ
%<post%>%<ins%>:ಿನಿಂದ # ;!ಹಿಂದ
%<post%>%<ins%>:ಿನಿಂದಲ oo__inc_clit ;!ಹಿಂದ

%<adv%>+%ಒಮ್ಮೆ%<adv%>:ೊಮ್ಮೆ # ; 


LEXICON 		ಕಾಲಕಾಲ__adv
%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>%<dat%>:ಕ್ಕೆ # ;
%<adv%>%<gen%>:ದ # ;
%<adv%>%<loc%>:ದಲ್ಲಿ # ;


LEXICON ಅಲ್ಲಿ__adv
%<adv%>:ಿ # ;
%<adv%>: ondu ;
%<adv%>: oo__inc_clit ;
%<adv%>%<emph%>:ಿಯೇ # ;
%<adv%>%<emph%>:ೇ # ;
%<adv%>%<gen%>:ಿಯ # ;
%<adv%>:ಿಯ oo__inc_clit ;
%<adv%>%<gen%>:ಿಯ varege__postpos ;
%<adv%>%<gen%>:ಿನ # ;
%<adv%>%<loc%>:ಿಂದ # ;
%<adv%>%<dat%>:ಿಗೆ # ;
%<adv%>:ಿ ide__vaux;
%<adv%>: oo__inc_clit  ;

!ಮೇಲಿರುವ 





LEXICON ಅಲ್ಲದೆ__adv!heege
%<adv%>:ೆ # ;
%<adv%>:  endare__part ;
%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>%<emph%>:ೇ #;
%<adv%>%<emph%>:ೆಯೇ #;
%<adv%>%<emph%>:ಗ ide__vaux;
%<adv%>%<emph%>:ide__vaux;

LEXICON ಮಾತ್ರ__adv
%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>: allade ;
%<adv%>%<neg%>: ವಲ್ಲ #;
%<adv%>%<neg%>: ವಲ್ಲದೇ #;

LEXICON ನಿಜವಾಗಿ__adv
%<adv%>: #;
%<adv%>:ಯ oo__inc_clit ;
%<adv%>%<emph%>:ಯೇ #;

LEXICON allade
%+ಅಲ್ಲದೆ%<adv%>:ವಲ್ಲದೆ # ;
%+ಅಲ್ಲದೆ%<adv%>:ವಲ್ಲದ ide__vaux ;

%+ಅಲ್ಲದೆ%<adv%>:ಲ್ಲದೆ # ;

LEXICON ನಡುವೆ__adv
%<adv%>:ೆ # ;
%<adv%>%<gen%>:ಿನ # ;
%<adv%>:ೆಯ oo__inc_clit ;

LEXICON ನಂತರ__adv
%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>:ವ oo__inc_clit;
%<adv%>%<emph%>:ವೇ #;
%<adv%>%<gen%>:ದ # ;
%<adv%>%<loc%>:ದಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<adv%>%<loc%>%<emph%>:ದಲ್ಲೇ  # ;
%<adv%>%<ins%>:ದಿಂದ # ;

LEXICON ಇನ್ನು__adv
%<adv%>:ು # ;!ಇನ್ನೆರಡು
%<adv%>%+ಎರಡು%<num%>:ೆರಡು # ;
%<adv%>%<emph%>:ೂ # ;
%<adv%>%+ಉಳಿದ%<adj%>:ುಳಿದ # ;


LEXICON __adv__gen
%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>%<gen%>:ಿನ # ;

LEXICON __adv__e
%<adv%>:ಿ # ;
%<adv%>:ಿವೆ # ;!ive
%<adv%>:oo__inc_clit  ;
%<adv%>:ಿಯ varege__postpos ;
%<adv%>:ಿಯ oo__inc_clit ;
%<adv%>:ಿ ide__vaux ;
%<adv%>%<gen%>:ಿನ # ;
%<adv%>%<dat%>:ಿಗೆ # ;

LEXICON __adv__ye
%<adv%>:ೆ # ;
%<adv%>%<gen%>:ಿನ # ;

LEXICON __abbr
%<abbr%>: # ;


LEXICON __cnjcoo
%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON and__cnjcoo
%<cnjcoo%>: oo__inc_clit ;

LEXICON cozof__cnjcoo
%<cnjcoo%>: # ;
%<cnjcoo%>%<emph%>:ಲೇ # ;

LEXICON NounRoot
ಕಿ.ಮೀ.:ಕಿ.ಮೀ.					__abbr;!K.m
ಕಿಮೀ:ಕಿಮೀ 						__abbr;!Km
ಉದಾ:ಉದಾ							__abbr;!eg.
ಡಾ.:ಡಾ. 							__abbr;!Dr.
ಶ.:ಶ. 							__abbr;
ಶ 								__abbr;
ಬಿಬಿಸಿ:ಬಿಬಿಸಿ 					__abbr;
ಸೆಂ.ಮೀ. 							__abbr;
ಮಿಸ್ :ಮಿಸ್  					__abbr;
ಎಲ್ಎಲ್ಸಿ:ಎಲ್ಎಲ್% ಸಿ 				 __abbr;
ಮಾಡುವುದು:ಮಾಡುವುದ					gerund__n;
ಎನ್ನುವುದು:ಎನ್ನುವುದ 				gerund__n;
ಮುಖಂಡ:ಮುಖಂಡ 					ಹುಡುಗ__n;
ಸದಸ್ಯ:ಸದಸ್ಯ 					ಹುಡುಗ__n;
ನಟ:ನಟ 							ಹುಡುಗ__n;
ಕಲಾವಿದ:ಕಲಾವಿದ 					ಹುಡುಗ__n;
ಮಹಾರಾಜ್:ಮಹಾರಾಜ್					ಹುಡುಗ__n;
ಮುಖ್ಯಸ್ಥ:ಮುಖ್ಯಸ್ಥ 			ಹುಡುಗ__n;
ಅಧ್ಯಾಪಕ:ಅಧ್ಯಾಪಕ 				ಹುಡುಗ__n;	
ರಾಜಕುಮಾರ:ರಾಜಕುಮಾರ 				ಹುಡುಗ__n;
ಮೊಮ್ಮಗ:ಮೊಮ್ಮಗ 				ಹುಡುಗ__n;
ಪಾಂಡವ:ಪಾಂಡವ 						ಹುಡುಗ__n;
ಜನಸಾಮಾನ್ಯ:ಜನಸಾಮಾನ್ಯ 			ಜನರು__n;
ಇರಾಕಿನಾಗರಿಕ:ಇರಾಕಿನಾಗರಿಕ 					ಜನರು__n;
ಕಿವುಡಿವವರಲ್ಲನೇಕ:ಕಿವುಡಿವವರಲ್ಲನೇಕ 					ಜನರು__n;
ಜ್ಞಾತ್ರಿಕ:ಜ್ಞಾತ್ರಿಕ 					ಜನರು__n;
ನಾಯ್ಕ:ನಾಯ್ಕ 					ಜನರು__n;
ಪ್ರಕಾಶಕ:ಪ್ರಕಾಶಕ 					ಜನರು__n;
ಭೂತೋಚ್ಚಾಟಕ:ಭೂತೋಚ್ಚಾಟಕ 					ಜನರು__n;
ಯುವಸೈನಿಕ:ಯುವಸೈನಿಕ 					ಜನರು__n;
ವೀರನಾಯಕ:ವೀರನಾಯಕ 					ಜನರು__n;
ಸಿಖ್ಕ:ಸಿಖ್ಕ 					ಜನರು__n;
ಸ್ವತಃ:ಸ್ವತಃ   					ಸ್ವತಃ__n;
ಸ್ವಯಂ:ಸ್ವಯಂ 					ಸ್ವತಃ__n;
ತಾಯಿ:ತಾಯ        				ತಾಯ__n;
ಅಕ್ಕ:ಅಕ್ಕ 						sis__n;
ರಾಣಿ:ರಾಣಿ 						ಮಹಿಳೆ__n;
ಪತ್ನಿ:ಪತ್ನಿ 						ಮಹಿಳೆ__n;
ಸ್ತ್ರೀ:ಸ್ತ್ರೀ 					ಮಹಿಳೆ__n;
ನಟಿ:ನಟಿ 							ಮಹಿಳೆ__n;!
ದೇವಿ:ದೇವಿ 						ಮಹಿಳೆ__n;
ದೇವತೆ:ದೇವತೆ 						ಮಹಿಳೆ__n;
ನಾಯಕಿ:ನಾಯಕಿ 					ಮಹಿಳೆ__n;
ಮಾತೃ:ಮಾತೃ 						ಮಹಿಳೆ__n;
ಲೇಡಿ:ಲೇಡಿ 						ಮಹಿಳೆ__n;	
ಹೆಂಗಸು:ಹೆಂಗಸ 						women__n;
ಹೆಣ್ಣು:ಹೆಣ್ಣ 						women__n;
ಕ್ವೀನ್:ಕ್ವೀನ್ 					women__n;
ಕ್ವೀನ್ಸ್:ಕ್ವೀನ್ಸ್ 				women__n;
ಅಣು:ಅಣು 						ಅಣು__n;
ಋತು:ಋತು 						ಅಣು__n;
ಮಿಶ್ರಣ:ಮಿಶ್ರಣ 					ಅಣು__n;
ಗುಣಮಟ್ಟ:ಗುಣಮಟ್ಟ 				ಅಣು__n;
ಅಂಶ:ಅಂಶ 						ಅಣು__n;
ಪರಮಾಣು:ಪರಮಾಣು 					ಅಣು__n;
ಸ್ನಾಯು:ಸ್ನಾಯು                   	ಅಣು__n;
ಶುರು:ಶುರು 						ಅಣು__n;
ಹೊಸ:ಹೊಸ 						__adj__ondu;
ಎಷ್ಟು:ಎಷ್ಟ 						ಎಷ್ಟು__adj;
ಸ್ವಲ್ಪ:ಸ್ವಲ್ಪ 					ve__adj;
ನಿರೋಧಕ:ನಿರೋಧಕ 					ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು__adj;
ಅಪ್ರತಿಮ:ಅಪ್ರತಿಮ 				ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು__adj;
ಅಭಿವೃದ್ಧಿಯೇತರ:ಅಭಿವೃದ್ಧಿಯೇತರ 					ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು__adj;
ಅತಿದೊಡ್ಡಪೂರ್ವ:ಅತಿದೊಡ್ಡಪೂರ್ವ 				ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು__adj;
ಅಣ್ವಯಿಕ:ಅಣ್ವಯಿಕ 						ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು__adj;
ಚೌಪಚಾರಿಕ:ಚೌಪಚಾರಿಕ 						ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು__adj;
ಮನೋಅಧ್ಯಾತ್ಮಿಕ:ಮನೋಅಧ್ಯಾತ್ಮಿಕ 						ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು__adj;
ಸೈಸರ್ಗಿಕ:ಸೈಸರ್ಗಿಕ 						ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು__adj;
ಸೂಚನಾತ್ಮಕ:ಸೂಚನಾತ್ಮಕ 					ಒಳ್ಳೆಯದು__adj;
ಚಿಕ್ಕ:ಚಿಕ್ಕ 					nom__adj;
ಅನೆಕ:ಅನೆಕ 					nom__adj;
ಅನೆಕ:ಆನೇಕ                  	nom__adj;
ಮಾತ್ರ:ಮಾತ್ರ 					ಮಾತ್ರ__adv;
ನಿಜವಾಗಿ:ನಿಜವಾಗಿ					ನಿಜವಾಗಿ__adv;
ಮುಂಚಿತವಾಗಿ:ಮುಂಚಿತವಾಗಿ 			ನಿಜವಾಗಿ__adv;
ಹೊರಗೆ:ಹೊರಗ       				__adv__ye;
ಅಡಿಯಲ್ಲಿ:ಅಡಿಯಲ್ಲಿ 				__adv__ye;
ಈಗ:ಈಗ 							__adv__e;
ಎಲ್ಲಿ:ಎಲ್ಲ        				__adv__e;
ಆಗ:ಆಗ 							__adv__gen;
ಇತ್ತೀಚೆಗೆ:ಇತ್ತೀಚೆಗೆ 				__adv__gen;
ನಂತರ:ನಂತರ        				ನಂತರ__adv;
ನಂತರ:ಆನಂತರ        				ನಂತರ__adv;!?
ಪ್ರತಿವರ್ಷ:ಪ್ರತಿವರ್ಷ 				ನಂತರ__adv;!
ಹತ್ತಿರ:ಹತ್ತಿರ 					ನಂತರ__adv;!
ಮುನ್ನ:ಮುನ್ನ 						ನಂತರ__adv;
ಬಹಳ:ಬಹಳ							ನಂತರ__adv;
ಪ್ರತಿದಿನ:ಪ್ರತಿದಿನ 				ನಂತರ__adv;
ಕಾಲಕ್ರಮ:ಕಾಲಕ್ರಮ 					ನಂತರ__adv;
ಸದ್ಯ:ಸದ್ಯ 						now__adv;
ಇನ್ನು:ಇನ್ನ 						ಇನ್ನು__adv;
ಯಾವುದಾದರು:ಯಾವುದಾದರ 				ಇನ್ನು__adv;
ಇಂದು:ಇಂದ 						ಇಂದು__adv;
ಅಂದು:ಅಂದ 						ಇಂದು__adv;
ಎದುರು:ಎದುರ 						ಇಂದು__adv;
ಯಾವತ್ತ:ಯಾವತ್ತ 					ಇಂದು__adv;
ಕೊನೆಯ:ಕೊನೆಯ 						__adv;
ಇಲ್ಲಿ:ಇಲ್ಲ       				__adv__e;
ಅಲ್ಲಿ:ಅಲ್ಲ 						ಅಲ್ಲಿ__adv;
ಇಲ್ಲಿ:ಇಲ್ಲ 						ಅಲ್ಲಿ__adv;
ಅಷ್ಟರಲ್ಲಿ:ಅಷ್ಟರಲ್ಲ 	 			ಅಲ್ಲಿ__adv;
ಮೇಲೆ:ಮೇಲ 						ಅಲ್ಲಿ__adv;
ಕಾಲಕಾಲ:ಕಾಲಕಾಲ 				ಕಾಲಕಾಲ__adv;
ಸಮಕ್ಷಮ:ಸಮಕ್ಷಮ 				ಕಾಲಕಾಲ__adv;
ಅಕ್ಕಪಕ್ಕ:ಅಕ್ಕಪಕ್ಕ 				ಕಾಲಕಾಲ__adv;
ಕಾಲಾಂತರ:ಕಾಲಾಂತರ  				ಕಾಲಕಾಲ__adv;
ನಿತ್ಯ:ನಿತ್ಯ 				ಕಾಲಕಾಲ__adv;
ಶೀಘ್ರ:ಶೀಘ್ರ                    	soon__adv;
ದಿನನಿತ್ಯ:ದಿನನಿತ್ಯ               soon__adv;
ತಕ್ಷಣ:ತಕ್ಷಣ 						soon__adv;
ಒಳಗೆ:ಒಳಗ 						ಒಳಗೆ__adv;
ಒಳಕ್ಕೆ:ಒಳಕ್ಕ 						ಒಳಗೆ__adv;
ಇತ್ಯಾದಿ:ಇತ್ಯಾದಿ					ಇತ್ಯಾದಿ__adv;
ಮುಖ್ಯವಾಗಿ:ಮುಖ್ಯವಾಗಿ 			__adv;
ಸಹಾ:ಸಹಾ 							__adv;
ಬಾಹ್ಯ:ಬಾಹ್ಯ 					__adv;
ಸತತ:ಸತತ 						__adv;	
ಆಮೇಲೆ:ಆಮೇಲೆ 						__adv;
ಪ್ರತಿಯಾಗಿ:ಪ್ರತಿಯಾಗಿ 				__adv;	
ಐತಿಹಾಸಿಕವಾಗಿ:ಐತಿಹಾಸಿಕವಾಗಿ 			__adv;
ನಂತೆ:ನಂತೆ 								__adv;
ಆದ್ದರಿಂದ:ಆದ್ದರಿಂದ 			cozof__cnjcoo;
ಮತ್ತು:ಮತ್ತ       			and__cnjcoo;
ಹಾಗು:ಹಾಗು       				__cnjcoo;
ಆದರೆ:ಆದರೆ          			__cnjcoo;
ವೇಳೆ:ವೇಳೆ 			  			__cnjcoo;
ಅಥವಾ:ಅಥವಾ 		  			__cnjcoo;
ಇಲ್ಲದೆ:ಇಲ್ಲದೆ					__cnjcoo;
ತನಕ:ತನಕ			  			__cnjcoo;
ಬಿಟ್ಟು:ಬಿಟ್ಟು 				__cnjcoo;
ಸೇರಿಸಿ:ಸೇರಿಸಿ 					__cnjcoo;
ಎಂಬುದಾಗಿ:ಎಂಬುದಾಗಿ				__cnjcoo;
ನಡುವೆ:ನಡುವ					ನಡುವೆ__adv;
